Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5521
Nebraska average annual wage, defined.

Nebraska average annual wage means the most recent average annual wage paid by all employers in this state for the most recent calendar year as reported by the Department of Labor on or before the July 1 immediately prior to the beginning of the particular year the company applied for benefits for which such determination applies.

Laws 2001, LB 620, § 21.